Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . dd. 2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro- 1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine. Other name: Butonitazene. NEW PARAGRAPH . de. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)- 5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name: Flunitazene. NEW PARAGRAPH . df. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4- methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name: Metodesnitazene. NEW PARAGRAPH . dg. N-phenyl-N-(1-(2- phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)acetamide. Other name: beta-methylacetyl fentanyl. House File 2202, p. 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . dh. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-20carboxamide. Other name: meta-fluorofuranyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . di. N-(2-chlorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: ortho-chlorofentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . dj. N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide. Other name: ortho-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . dk. N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: para-chlorofentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . dl. N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)pentanamide. Other name: para-fluoro valeryl fentanyl. NEW PARAGRAPH . dm. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)- N-phenyltetrahydrothiophene-2-carboxamide. Other names: tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl; tetrahydrothiophene fentanyl. Sec. 2. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . cq. 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (dimethylamino)pentan-1-one. Other names: dipentylone; N,N-dimethylpentylone. Sec. 3. Section 124.204, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . m. ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2- yl)acetate. Other name: ethylphenidate. Sec. 4. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . w. 2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other names: N-pyrrolidino metonitazene; metonitazepyne. NEW PARAGRAPH . x. 5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1-(2- (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other names: N-pyrrolidino protonitazene; protonitazepyne. Sec. 5. Section 124.204, subsection 9, paragraphs c, e, and f, Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. House File 2202, p. 3 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2202, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor